Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-2703
State Highway Capital Improvement Fund; created; use; investment.

(1) The State Highway Capital Improvement Fund is created. The fund shall consist of money credited to the fund pursuant to subsection (4) of section 39-2215, proceeds of bonds issued pursuant to subsection (3) of section 39-2223, and any other money as determined by the Legislature.

(2) The department may create or direct the creation of accounts within the fund as the department determines to be appropriate and useful in administering the fund.

(3) Any money in the fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act. Investment earnings from investment of money in the fund shall be credited to the fund.

Laws 2011, LB84, § 3;

Laws 2023, LB727, § 43.

Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.